Utah statutes.
75-3-914.   Disposition of unclaimed assets.

(1) If an heir, devisee or claimant cannot be found, the personal representative shall distribute the share of the missing person to his conservator, if any, but otherwise to the state treasurer for the benefit of the state school fund.

(2)  The money received by the state treasurer shall be paid to the person entitled on proof of his right to it or, if the state treasurer refuses or fails to pay, the person may petition the court which appointed the personal representative, whereupon the court upon notice to the state treasurer may determine the person entitled to the money and order the treasurer to pay it to him. No interest is allowed thereon, and the heir, devisee, or claimant shall pay all costs and expenses incident to the proceeding.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

